Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1919
License requirement; exemption.

Nothing in sections 18-1915 to 18-1919 shall be construed to require an employee working for a single employer as part of such employer's full-time staff and not holding himself or herself out to the public for hire to hold a license while acting within the scope of employment for such employer.

Laws 1969, c. 100, § 5, p. 475;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 130.